North Carolina, session 2025, SB115.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 1.1. A. Graham Shirley of the Third Judicial Division is appointed as a
Special Superior Court Judge for a term expiring December 31, 2032.
SECTION 1.2. Montell W. Irvin of Wake County is appointed to the North Carolina
Turnpike Authority for a term expiring January 13, 2029.
SECTION 1.3. Effective March 1, 2025, Phil Byrd of Guilford County and Benjamin
Curtis of Rockingham County are appointed to the Governor's Crime Commission for terms
expiring February 28, 2027.
SECTION 1.4. Effective July 1, 2025, Michael C. Brown of New Hanover County
is appointed to the Local Government Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2029.
SECTION 1.5.(a) Katherine Martin of Wake County is appointed to the North
Carolina Child Care Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2026.
SECTION 1.5.(b) Terra Flint of Rockingham County is appointed to the North
Carolina Child Care Commission for a term expiring June 30, 2025, to fill the unexpired term of
Ashley B. Snyder.
PART II. SPEAKER'S RECOMMENDATIONS
SECTION 2.1. Ryan D. Holden of Johnston County is appointed to the 911 Board
for a term expiring December 31, 2028, to fill the unexpired term of Earl W. Struble.
SECTION 2.2. Amy S. Pearson of Nash County is appointed to the Nash Community
College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2025, to fill the unexpired term of James
Martin.
SECTION 2.3. The Honorable Mike Woodard of Durham County is appointed to
the Durham Technical Community College Board of Trustees for a term expiring June 30, 2025,
to fill the unexpired term of Dr. Mike Lee.
SECTION 2.4. Lindalyn Kakadelis of Moore County is appointed to the North
Carolina Charter Schools Review Board for a term expiring June 30, 2025, to fill the unexpired
term of David Machado.
SECTION 2.5. Seth Ellington of Wake County is appointed to the Building Code
Council for a term expiring January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2.6. Paul Boney of New Hanover County is appointed to the Building
Code Council for a term expiring January 1, 2029.
SECTION 2.7. Mark Smith of Guilford County is appointed to the Building Code
Council for a term expiring January 1, 2031.
PART III. CORRECTIONS
*S115-v-5*

SECTION 3.1. Section 1.3 of S.L. 2024-56 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.3. Effective January 1, 2025, the Honorable Wayne Sasser of Stanly County
is appointed to NCInnovation for a term expiring June 30, 2027, September 30, 2027, to fill the
unexpired term of Beth A. Friedrich."
SECTION 3.2. Section 1.11 of S.L. 2024-56 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 1.11. If Senate Bill 382 of the 2023 General Assembly becomes law, then
effective January 1, 2025, Thomas Currin of Wake County S. Thomas Currin, II, of the Third
Judicial Division is appointed as a Special Superior Court Judge for a term that expires January
1, 2032.expiring January 1, 2033."
PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. This act is effective when it becomes law. Unless otherwise provided,
terms begin upon the effective date of this act.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 27th day of February,
2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Howard Penny, Jr.
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
Page 2 Session Law 2025-1 Senate Bill 115